Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.020

Elections—Terms of commissioners—Vacancies.

(1) All regular elections in cities organized under the statutory commission form of government shall be held quadrennially in the odd-numbered years on the dates provided in RCW 29A.04.330. However, after commissioners are elected at the next general election occurring in 1995 or 1997, regular elections in cities organized under a statutory commission form of government shall be held biennially at municipal general elections.

(2) The commissioners shall be nominated and elected at large. Their terms shall be for four years and until their successors are elected and qualified and assume office in accordance with RCW 29A.60.280. However, at the next regular election of a city organized under a statutory commission form of government, the terms of office of commissioners shall occur with the person who is elected as a commissioner receiving the least number of votes being elected to a two-year term of office and the other two persons who are elected being elected to four-year terms of office. Thereafter, commissioners shall be elected to four-year terms of office.

(3) Vacancies on a commission shall occur and shall be filled as provided in chapter 42.12 RCW.

[ 2013 c 11 s 87. Prior: 1994 c 223 s 10; 1994 c 119 s 1; 1979 ex.s. c 126 s 17; 1965 c 7 s 35.17.020; prior: 1963 c 200 s 12; 1959 c 86 s 2; 1955 c 55 s 9; prior: (i) 1911 c 116 s 5; RRS s 9094. (ii) 1943 c 25 s 1, part; 1911 c 116 s 3, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9092, part.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1979 ex.s. c 126: See RCW 29A.60.280(1).